src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V0_1Â_VUKK
! * Yaml: 
: VSUF-INF_ÂD ; !! (1)  Inf: lauggâd
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/NomAg+N:@C.NeedNoun@i NMN_PRSPRCÂ_VYKK-I ; !NOM-AG_ÂD ; ! 20251010
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2,
!! Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc
!!  Ind.Prt.ConNeg, Imprt+Pl3, PrfPrc
!! NomAct in MOsh

:^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (2,9)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: äibb
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Imprt+Pl3

+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^VOWLower^PAL^PALK%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: äiʹbbe
!! +Ind+Prs+Pl3

:^PAL^PALK VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: aiʹbbe
!! +Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

:^V2VV^YXX2YX VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (5-6)  Pot.Sg3: aaibâž
+Err/Orth-should-be-grade-minus1: VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (5-6) ERR
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+Sg4
!! Imprt+Sg2, Imprt+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, Cond, +Der+Der/Caus

+Imprt+Sg3:^V2VV^VOWLower^YXX2YX%>as K ; !!= * @CODE@ (7)  Imprt.Sg3: ääibas
!! Imprt+Sg3

: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: aibbu
!! Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

:^YXX2YX FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ; !!= * @CODE@ (10) Allegro for incoative: aib»


LEXICON V_1Â_VUCC !!= * @CODE@ aibbâd:aibb
: V0_1Â_VUCC ;
LEXICON IV_1Â_VUCC !!= * @CODE@ aibbâd:aibb
+IV: V0_1Â_VUCC ;
!LEXICON TV_1Â_VUCC !!= * @CODE@ aibbâd:aibb
!+TV: V0_1Â_VUCC ;
LEXICON V0_1Â_VUCC !!= * @CODE@ aibbâd:aibb
!!! inflection_type="1"
!!! V1YXX_ÂD
! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: 354)
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
! 1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1[221] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster alternation)
!   Strong grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3
!   Strong grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Weak grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: aibbâd
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: äibb
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: äiʹbbe
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: aiʹbbe
! (5)  Imprt.Sg2: aaib
! (6)  Pot.Sg3: aaibâž
! (7)  Imprt.Sg3: ääibas
! (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: aibbu
! (9)  Ind.Imprt.Pl3: äibbaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: aib»
! * Yaml: 
: VSUF-INF_ÂD ; !! (1)  Inf: aibbâd
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/NomAg+N:@C.NeedNoun@i NMN_PRSPRCÂ_VYXX-I ; !NOM-AG_ÂD ; ! 20251010
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2,
!! Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc
!!  Ind.Prt.ConNeg, Imprt+Pl3, PrfPrc
!! NomAct in MOsh

:^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (2,9)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: äibb
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Imprt+Pl3

+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^VOWLower^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: äiʹbbe
!! +Ind+Prs+Pl3

:^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: aiʹbbe
!! +Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

:^V2VV^YXX2YX VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (5-6)  Pot.Sg3: aaibâž
+Err/Orth-should-be-grade-minus1: VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (5-6) ERR
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+Sg4
!! Imprt+Sg2, Imprt+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, Cond, +Der+Der/Caus

+Imprt+Sg3:^V2VV^VOWLower^YXX2YX%>as K ; !!= * @CODE@ (7)  Imprt.Sg3: ääibas
!! Imprt+Sg3

: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: aibbu
!! Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

:^YXX2YX FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ; !!= * @CODE@ (10) Allegro for incoative: aib»

LEXICON V_1Â_VYKK !!= * @CODE@ kalggâd:ka^1VOW{ʹØ}lgg
: V0_1Â_VYKK ;
LEXICON IV_1Â_VYKK !!= * @CODE@ kalggâd:ka^1VOW{ʹØ}lgg
+IV: V0_1Â_VYKK ;
LEXICON TV_1Â_VYKK !!= * @CODE@ kalggâd:ka^1VOW{ʹØ}lgg
+TV: V0_1Â_VYKK ;
LEXICON V0_1Â_VYKK
! FORMS
! * Yaml: 
: VSUF-INF_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (1)  Inf: kalggâd
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/NomAg+N:@C.NeedNoun@i NMN_PRSPRCÂ_VYKK-I ; !NOM-AG_ÂD ; ! 20251010
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2,
!! Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc
!!  Ind.Prt.ConNeg, Imprt+Pl3, PrfPrc
!! NomAct in MOsh

:^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (2,9)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: tåbdd
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Imprt+Pl3

+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^VOWLower^PAL^PALK%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: tåʹbdde
!! +Ind+Prs+Pl3

:^PAL^PALK VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: toʹbdde
!! +Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

:^V2VV^YXX2YX VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (5-6)  Pot.Sg3: toobdâž
+Err/Orth-should-be-grade-minus1: VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (5-6) ERR
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+Sg4
!! Imprt+Sg2, Imprt+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, Cond, +Der+Der/Caus

+Imprt+Sg3:^V2VV^VOWLower^YXX2YX%>as K ; !!= * @CODE@ (7)  Imprt.Sg3: tååbdas
+Err/Orth:^V2VV^VOWLower^YXX2YX CONDITIONAL ; !!= * @CODE@ 
!! Imprt+Sg3

: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: tobddu
!! Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

:^YXX2YX FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ; !!= * @CODE@ (10) Allegro for incoative: tobd»



LEXICON V_1Â_VYXX !!= * @CODE@ tobddâd:to^1VOW{ʹØ}bdd
: V0_1Â_VYXX ;
!LEXICON IV_1Â_VYXX !!= * @CODE@ tobddâd:to^1VOW{ʹØ}bdd
!+IV: V0_1Â_VYXX ;
LEXICON TV_1Â_VYXX !!= * @CODE@ tobddâd:to^1VOW{ʹØ}bdd
+TV: V0_1Â_VYXX ;
LEXICON V0_1Â_VYXX !!= * @CODE@ tobddâd:to^1VOW{ʹØ}bdd
!!! inflection_type="1"
!!! V1YXX_Y
! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: 354)
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
! 1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1[221] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster alternation)
!   Strong grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3
!   Strong grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Weak grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! * Yaml: 
: VSUF-INF_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (1)  Inf: tobddâd
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2,
!! Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc
!!  Ind.Prt.ConNeg, Imprt+Pl3, PrfPrc
!! NomAct in MOsh

:^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (2,9)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: tåbdd
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Imprt+Pl3

+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^VOWLower^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: tåʹbdde
!! +Ind+Prs+Pl3

:^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: toʹbdde
!! +Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

:^V2VV^YXX2YX VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (5-6)  Pot.Sg3: toobdâž
+Err/Orth-should-be-grade-minus1: VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (5-6) ERR
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+Sg4
!! Imprt+Sg2, Imprt+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, Cond, +Der+Der/Caus

+Imprt+Sg3:^V2VV^VOWLower^YXX2YX%>as K ; !!= * @CODE@ (7)  Imprt.Sg3: tååbdas
+Err/Orth:^V2VV^VOWLower^YXX2YX CONDITIONAL ; !!= * @CODE@ 
!! Imprt+Sg3

: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: tobddu
!! Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

:^YXX2YX FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ; !!= * @CODE@ (10) Allegro for incoative: tobd»


LEXICON V_OHTTYD !!= * @CODE@ õhttâd:õhtt
: V0_OHTTYD ;
LEXICON IV_OHTTYD !!= * @CODE@ õhttâd:õhtt
+IV: V0_OHTTYD ;
!LEXICON TV_OHTTYD !!= * @CODE@ õhttâd:õhtt
!+TV: V0_OHTTYD ;
LEXICON V0_OHTTYD !!= * @CODE@ õhttâd:õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt
!!! inflection_type="1"
!!! V1HC2_ÂD
! FORMS
! * Yaml: 
: VSUF-INF_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (1)  Inf: õhttâd
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2,
!! Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc
!!  Ind.Prt.ConNeg, Imprt+Pl3, PrfPrc
!! NomAct in MOsh

:^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (2,9)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: âhtt
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Imprt+Pl3

+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^VOWLower^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: âʹhtte
!! +Ind+Prs+Pl3

:^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: õʹhtte
!! +Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

:^V2VV^YXX2VX VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (5-6)  Pot.Sg3: õõutâž
+Err/Orth-should-be-grade-minus1: VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (5-6) ERR
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+Sg4
!! Imprt+Sg2, Imprt+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, Cond, +Der+Der/Caus

+Imprt+Sg3:^V2VV^VOWLower^YXX2VX%>as K ; !!= * @CODE@ (7)  Imprt.Sg3: ââutas
!! Imprt+Sg3

: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: õhttu
!! Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

:^YXX2VX FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ; !!= * @CODE@ (10) Allegro for incoative: õut»


LEXICON V_1Â_UOYXX
 V0_1Â_UOYXX ;
LEXICON IV_1Â_UOYXX
+IV: V0_1Â_UOYXX ;
LEXICON V0_1Â_UOYXX
! THIS NEEDS MORE DEVELOPING
: VSUF-INF_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (1)  Inf: kuõskkâd
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2,
!! Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc
!!  Ind.Prt.ConNeg, Imprt+Pl3, PrfPrc
!! NomAct in MOsh

:^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: kuâskk
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Imprt+Pl3

+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^VOWLower^PALE^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: kueʹsǩǩe (allophonic)
!! +Ind+Prs+Pl3

:^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: kuõʹsǩǩe
!! +Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

:^YXX2YX VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (5-6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: kuõskâž
+Err/Orth-should-be-grade-minus1: VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (5-6) ERR
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+Sg4
!! Imprt+Sg2, Imprt+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, Cond, +Der+Der/Caus

+Imprt+Sg3:^VOWLower^YXX2YX%>as K ; !!= * @CODE@ (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: kuâskas
!! Imprt+Sg3

: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@ (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: kuõskku
!! Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

:^VOWLower%>az K ; !!= * @CODE@ (9)  Ind.Imprt.Pl3: kuâskkaz
!! Imprt+Pl3


:^YXX2YX FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ; !!= * @CODE@ (10) Allegro for incoative: kuõsk»

!LEXICON V_1Â_UOYKK
LEXICON V_1Â_UOYKK !!= * @CODE@ kuõskkâd:kuõskk
: V0_1Â_UOYKK ;
